<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20090612.0080" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
US student has her day in Italian court over sex-murder
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
PERUGIA, Italy, June 12, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
American student Amanda Knox exuded confidence Friday as she rejected charges
that she helped kill her British housemate after group sex play turned violent
in an Italian university town.
Accusing police of hitting and bullying her to force her to make false
statements, Knox said she had spent the night of the November 2007 sex-murder at
the home of her Italian boyfriend of two weeks, Raffaele Sollicito.
"The declarations were taken against my will," said Knox, 21, taking the stand
for the first time since the trial began in January, asserting that her
interrogators repeatedly called her a "stupid liar."
"Everything I said was said in confusion and under pressure and because they
were suggested by the (investigators)," she added.
Asked whether police had hit her before she stated that the victim, Meredith
"Mez" Kercher of Coulsdon, England, had been raped, she replied "yes."
Knox also said harsh questioning had pushed her to state that she was at home at
the time of the murder and could hear Kercher scream, and to accuse her part-
time boss of the crime.
Instead, Knox said Friday, she spent the night with Sollecito at his flat, where
they smoked marijuana, had sex and watched a movie.
The two, who face 30 years in prison if convicted, have been held since a few
days after Kercher was found semi-nude with her throat cut in the house in the
walled medieval town of Perugia that she shared with Knox.
The lurid headlines in Britain and Knox's hometown of Seattle, Washington,
sparked fears that she would not have a fair trial.
Prosecutors allege that the 22-year-old victim was murdered after refusing to
join in an orgy on the night of November 1, 2007, along with 20-year-old Rudy
Guede, from Ivory Coast.
While claiming innocence, Guede, who worked as a casual labourer here, opted for
a "fast-track" trial and has already been convicted and sentenced to 30 years
for his role in the murder.
In the prosecutors' scenario, Guede held Kercher down while Sollecito and Knox
stabbed her.
Guede was quoted in Friday's Italian press as saying from his prison cell: "You
were there, Amanda, tell the truth."
Testifying in a clear, confident voice in fluent Italian, sometimes laughing or
gesticulating, Knox explained her nickname "Foxy Knoxy" as a reference to her
skill at football, which she said she had played since she was a child.
Knox, dressed in white with her hair pulled back in a ponytail, said her
relationship with Sollecito was "very special," and that she had fallen in love
with him just two weeks before the murder.
Asked about a red area on her neck shown widely in newspaper close-ups after her
arrest, she laughed and said it was a "hickey, a love bite from Raffaele."
Knox said her questioners had led her to accuse bar owner and musician Patrick
Lumumba, for whom she worked twice a week, of murdering Kercher.
"In my confusion I started to imagine that maybe I was traumatised, like what
they said," she told Lumumba's lawyer Carlo Pacelli.
The Congolese Lumumba, who was held for two weeks before being released without
charge, is suing Knox for defamation and was present at the hearing.
The defendant said she was "very sorry, gutted, (when she learned) that Patrick
was still in jail because of me."
Pacelli later told AFP: "She is a very good actress."
Knox's early statement that she covered her ears so as not to hear Meredith's
screams "was true," Pacelli said, insisting that her questioners could not have
suggested that scenario.
Also Friday, Knox said that when she heard that Guede was arrested, "I thought
they would let me go... I felt great relief, but then they kept me in custody."
Kercher's family are seeking 30 million euros (40 million dollars) from the
alleged killers.
Their lawyer Francesco Maresca dismissed assertions of a bungled investigation,
telling AFP: "The probe was perfect, very good work."
He was confident of a conviction in the long-running trial. "All the necessary
elements are in place to arrive at a conviction... probably in October."
Both Kercher and Knox had arrived in the normally quiet Umbrian university town
in September 2007.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20090613.0324" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
US student faces tough questioning in Italy sex-murder trial
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
perugia, Italy, June 13, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
American Amanda Knox faced tough questioning Saturday while testifying for a
second day in a trial over whether she helped kill a British housemate who
refused to join in a group sex session in Italy.
Prominent public prosecutor Giuliano Mignini grilled the 21-year-old exchange
student accused of taking part in group sex play that turned violent with the
stabbing death of Meredith Kercher, 22, of Britain.
In a testy exchange, Mignini questioned Knox's assertion that interrogators had
extracted false statements from her by bullying her, calling her a "stupid liar"
and even hitting her on the head at one point.
Knox gave a description of hours of questioning in which she said that she was
told that if she did not tell the truth they would "throw me in jail for 30
years."
Defence lawyers repeatedly objected during Mignini's examination, accusing him
of badgering the witness and asking her leading questions.
Mignini focused on Knox's assertions that her false statements -- notably, that
her part-time employer Patrick Lumumba was the killer -- were the result of
"suggestions" during aggressive police questioning.
"Was Patrick's name indicated after they saw (her SMS) message (to Lumumba) or
just like that?" Mignini asked, sparking a heated row with the defence team that
judge Giancarlo Massei had difficulty quelling.
Knox said she became so confused after "a steady crescendo ... of 'I don't
know,' 'you're a stupid liar,' 'maybes,' and 'imagines' that ... I was led to
believe I had forgotten things."
She added: "When I said 'Patrick' I actually started to imagine a kind of movie,
images that could have explained the situation, Patrick's face, then (Perugia's)
Grimana square, then my house" on the night of the murder.
Knox had said Friday that harsh questioning had also pushed her to state that
she was at home at the time of the murder and could hear Kercher scream.
Instead, Knox said, she spent the night with Sollecito at his flat, where they
smoked marijuana, had sex and watched a movie.
The two, who face 30 years in prison if convicted, have been held since a few
days after Kercher was found semi-nude with her throat cut in the house in the
walled medieval town of Perugia that she shared with Knox.
The case has sparked lurid headlines in Britain and Knox's hometown of Seattle,
Washington.
Publicity over the case has sparked fears that she would not have a fair trial,
and Mignini's motives have been questioned.
The powerful prosecutor is currently under indictment for professional
misconduct and abuse of power.
Prosecutors allege that Kercher was murdered after refusing to join in an orgy
on the night of November 1, 2007, along with 20-year-old Rudy Guede, from Ivory
Coast.
While claiming innocence, Guede, who worked as a casual labourer here, opted for
a "fast-track" trial and has already been convicted and sentenced to 30 years
for his role in the murder.
In the prosecutors' scenario, Guede held Kercher down while Sollecito and Knox
stabbed her.
The Congolese Lumumba, who was held for two weeks before being released without
charge, is suing Knox for defamation and was present at the hearing.
The defendant said she was "very sorry, gutted, (when she learned) that Patrick
was still in jail because of me."
Lumumba's lawyer Carlo Pacelli told AFP later: "She is a very good actress."
Mignini was to be followed later Saturday by a lawyer from Kercher's family, who
are seeking 30 million euros (40 million dollars) from the alleged killers.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20090712.0290" type="advis" >
<HEADLINE>
AFP 1000 GMT News Advisory
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
PARIS, July 12, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Duty Editor: Andrew Gully

Tel: +33 1 40 41 46 36

+ Swiss hostage freed in Mali

+ NASA to try to launch shuttle after delay

+ Hondurans stage fresh protests

Mali-Qaeda-attacks-kidnap-Switzerland,newseries

TIMBUKTU, Mali

A Swiss hostage kidnapped in January by Al-Qaeda's north African branch is freed
in northern Mali as clashes between the army and Islamic militants escalate in
the country's northern desert region.

500 words 1200 GMT by Sergi Daniel. File Picture

US-space-shuttle-Japan-Canada-ISS,lead

CAPE CANAVERAL, Florida

The US space agency will make another attempt Sunday to launch the space shuttle
Endeavour after a dramatic lightning storm forces it to postpone the flight in
the latest blow to the seven-astronaut mission.

650 words 1045 GMT by Jean-Louis Santini

Please see also our special advisory on the anniversary of the moon landing

Honduras-politics-military-coup,lead

TEGUCIGALPA

Thousands of supporters and opponents of Manuel Zelaya stage rival
demonstrations as the ousted Honduran president held talks in Washington to
rally support for his return to power.

650 words 1045 GMT

We have also moved:        Honduras-politics-military-coup-Venezuela-US-
diplomacy,ANALYSIS

France-crime-Jews-court

PARIS

French Jewish groups accuse judges of leniency towards members of a Paris gang
called the "Barbarians" who tortured a Jewish youth to death, as calls mount for
a retrial in the case that shocked the country.

500 words 1100 GMT

Congo-vote,lead

BRAZZAVILLE

Congolese voters go to the polls to elect a new president, with incumbent Denis
Sassou Nguesso urging a big turnout, while several of his 12 rival candidates
have called for a boycott, accusing the government of inflating the electoral
roll.

600 words 1300 GMT. Picture

Italy-Philippines-Muslim-unrest-hostage-ICRC,2ndlead-WRAP

ZAMBOANGA, Philippines

Gaunt and haggard, freed Italian aid worker Eugenio Vagni says his release after
being held for six months by armed Islamic militants in the Philippines was a
day he thought might never come.

680 words 1100 GMT. Picture

China-unrest-Xinjiang,3rdlead-WRAP

URUMQI, China

Residents of China's Urumqi city are banned from gathering in public places for
a traditional day of mourning, one week after unrest between Muslim Uighurs and
Han Chinese left more than 180 people dead.

650 words 1130 GMT by Dan Martin. Picture

Please see our separate special advisory on the Xinjiang unrest

Australia-Britain-China-mining-diplomacy,lead

MELBOURNE

Australia warns China risks damaging its business reputation abroad by holding a
top Rio Tinto executive accused of spying and predicts a lengthy diplomatic
stand-off over his fate.

650 words moved by Neil Sands
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20090726.0134" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Former Pakistan MP held in connection with hostage killing
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
ISLAMABAD, July 26, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Pakistani authorities have arrested a former member of parliament in connection
with the murder of a Polish engineer decapitated by Taliban militants in
February, a security official said Sunday.
The official, speaking on condition of anonymity, told AFP that Shah Abdul Aziz
was arrested in May over his suspected involvement in the killing and was being
questioned but had not been charged.
He was arrested at his home in Karak, a remote town around 100 kilometres (60
miles) south of Peshawar, the capital of Northwest Frontier Province.
On July 16, Pakistani police arrested another man, Attaullah, in connection with
the killing and on Sunday arrested three other people suspected of links to
Stanczak's murder and of plotting militant attacks in Islamabad.
"These suspects were arrested in the light of a statement given by Attaullah
during interrogation," a senior security official said, requesting anonymity.
"We cannot say at this stage that these people were involved in the murder of
the Polish engineer," he said.
Police recovered hand grenades, pistols and ammunition during the raid on their
hideouts in the Barakahu area on the outskirts of Islamabad, he said.
Geologist Piotr Stanczak, 42, was working in Pakistan for a Polish oil and
natural gas exploration company when he was seized in the volatile northwest of
the country last September. His abductors killed his driver and his bodyguard.
His decapitation on February 7 -- which was filmed by his captors and was the
first of a Pole by Islamic militants -- provoked a furious reaction from Warsaw,
which accused Islamabad of "apathy" over tackling terrorism.
Poland has offered a 290,000-dollar reward for information leading to the
capture of the Taliban militants who beheaded Stanczak.
Warsaw had also requested US assistance to help capture Stanczak's killers.
Poland is a close ally of Washington and has sent hundreds of troops to
Pakistan's neighbour Afghanistan to battle the Taliban there as part of a NATO
force.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20090820.0805" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Canadian PM dives in sub for Arctic
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Ottawa, Aug 19, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Canadian Prime Minister Stephen Harper flew a military helicopter around an
iceberg, sailed a warship, and dove in a navy submarine Wednesday, heralding his
country's claim to the resource-rich Arctic.
On day three of a five-day visit to the far north, Harper took part in a
military exercise trumpeting Canada's sovereignty over a large Arctic tract east
of Baffin Island, where Russian and US submarines are said to prowl.
"With other countries probing our north by sea and in the air, the work you are
doing here to protect our sovereignty has never been more important," Harper
told sailors on the deck of HMCS Toronto.
"Protecting national sovereignty, the integrity of our borders, is the first and
foremost responsibility of a national government," he said.
Later, Harper zipped across Frobisher Bay to the submarine HMCS Corner Brook and
took its controls as it slipped beneath the icy waters for a 30-minute trip.
His office told AFP he took the controls of a large Sea King helicopter as it
flew past an iceberg, and briefly steered the warship HMCS Toronto.
Five countries bordering the Arctic -- Canada, Denmark, Norway, Russia and the
United States -- claim overlapping parts of the Arctic, which is estimated to
hold 90 billion untapped barrels of oil.
Moscow believes it should control the Northern Sea Route, a passage that
stretches from Asia to Europe across northern Russia.
In 2007, Russian submariners planted a flag on the ocean floor beneath the North
Pole in a symbolic staking of its claim over the region.
Canada, meanwhile, has claimed the famed Northwest Passage, but is at odds with
the United States which considers it to be international waters. The two allies
also cannot agree on the resource-rich Beaufort Sea, which touches both Alaska
and Canada's northern territories.
Since becoming prime minister in 2006, Harper has made Canadian sovereignty over
the Arctic a key priority of his government. This is Harper's third trip to the
region as prime minister.
Last year, Canada announced it was stepping up its military alertness along its
northern frontier in response to Russia "testing" its boundaries with military
flights skirting the border, which had not seen since the Cold War.
Ottawa responded with plans for a sensor net, more navy patrols and a military
training camp in the far north.
In its fifth year, the annual military exercises are the biggest they have ever
been, and include for the first time anti-submarine measures as well as the
deployment of a new elite Arctic commando unit.
On Tuesday, Harper held a cabinet meeting in Iqaluit, Nunavut and dined on seal
in support of Canada's maligned seal trade.
He also announced the creation of a northern economic development agency with 50
million Canadian dollars (45 million US) at its disposal to develop northern
infrastructure and aid locals.
Later in the week, Harper will travel to the Inuit hamlet Pangnirtung, on Baffin
Island, and to Yellowknife and Whitehorse, the regional capitals of the
Northwest Territories and the Yukon respectively.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20090827.0549" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Tennis: US Open men's penpix
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
New York, Aug 27, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Penpix of the favourites going into the US Open which gets under way at Flushing
Meadows here on Monday:-
ROGER FEDERER (SUI)
World ranking 1
Age: 28 (08.08.1981)
Birthplace: Basel, Switzerland
Residence: Bottmingen, Switzerland
Height: 6'1" (185 cm), Weight: 187 lbs (85 kg)
Plays: Right-handed
Turned Pro: 1998
Grand Slam Titles: 15 (2004, 2006, 2007 Australian Open, 2009 French Open,
2003-07 and 2009 Wimbledon, 2004-2008 US Open
Career Tour titles: 61
Best US Open result: Winner 2004-2008
Aiming to become the first man in 84 years to win the US Open six years running
and will once again start a strong favourite. Federer has had a remarkable year
to date. He lost to Rafael Nadal in the Australian Open final and failed to win
a tournament in the first five months of the year before completing his career
Grand Slam in the French Open and regaining his Wimbledon crown. He is back to
the world number one spot and won the Cincinnati Masters last week.
ANDY MURRAY (GBR)
World ranking 2
Age: 22 (15.05.1987)
Birthplace: Dunblane, Scotland
Residence: Dunblane, Scotland
Height: 6'3" (190 cm), Weight: 185 lbs (84 kg)
Plays: Right-handed
Turned Pro: 2005
Grand Slam Titles: 0
Career Tour Titles: 13
Best US Open result: Runner-Up 2008
Winner of a season-best five titles this year, Murray has ended the four-year
long Federer-Nadal domination of the top two world ranking spots and the belief
is widespread that he is ready to win his first Grand Slam title. Made the final
here last year but was swept aside in straight sets by a rampant Federer. Has
made more progress since then especially in terms of fitness and has an
impressive 6-3 winning record against the Swiss star.
RAFAEL NADAL (ESP)
World ranking 3
Age: 23 (03.06.1986)
Birthplace: Manacor, Mallorca, Spain
Residence: Manacor, Mallorca, Spain
Height: 6'1" (185 cm)
Weight: 188 lbs (85 kg)
Plays: Left-handed
Turned Pro: 2001
Grand Slam Titles: 6 (2009 Australian Open, 2005-2008 French Open, 2008
Wimbledon)
Career Tour Titles: 36
Best US Open result: Semi-finals 2008
Nadal's season has been in stark contrast to that of Federer. Dominant at the
start of the year when he won his first Australian Open, the Spaniard paid the
price for his physical exertions when he lost for the first time at Roland
Garros going down to eventual finalist Robin Soderling. He then took 10 weeks
out to heal his aching knees and has been less than convincing on his return to
action. Needs a US Open title to become just the seventh man to win all four
Grand Slam titles.
NOVAK DJOKOVIC (SRB)
World ranking 4
Age: 22 (22.05.1987)
Birthplace: Belgrade, Serbia
Residence: Monte Carlo, Monaco
Height: 6'2" (188 cm), Weight: 176 lbs (80 kg)
Plays: Right-handed
Turned Pro: 2003
Grand Slam Titles: 1 (2008 Australian Open)
Career Tour Titles: 13
Best US Open result: Runner-up 2007
After a breakthrough season in 2008 when he won his first Grand Slam title in
Melbourne and rose to number three in the world rankings, Djokovic has had a
steady if unspectacular year in 2009. Has failed to make it past the quarter-
finals in any of the Grand Slam tournaments, but won in Dubai and took Nadal to
the limit on clay in Madrid. Reached the final at the US Open in 2007 where he
lost in straight sets to Federer.
ANDY RODDICK (USA)
World ranking 5
Age: 26 (30.08.1982)
Birthplace: Omaha, Nebraska, USA
Residence: Austin, Texas, USA
Height: 6'2" (188 cm), Weight: 195 lbs (88 kg)
Plays: Right-handed
Turned Pro: 2000
Grand Slam Titles: 1 (2003 US Open)
Career Tour Titles: 27
Best US Open result: Winner 2003
Credits his marriage and a healthier diet for improving his mobility about the
court this year. Played well on clay at the French Open and then produced his
best display in years to reach the Wimbledon final where he took Federer to a
marathon five sets before losing. Lost twice to Juan Martin del Potro in the
buildup to New York. Lost to Federer in four sets in the US Open final in 2006
JUAN MARTIN DEL POTRO (ARG)
World ranking 6
Age: 20 (23.09.1988)
Birthplace: Tandil, Argentina
Residence: Tandil, Argentina
Height: 6'6" (198 cm), Weight: 182 lbs (83 kg)
Plays: Right-handed
Turned Pro: 2005
Grand Slam Titles: 0
Career Tour Titles: 6
Best US Open result: Quarter-finals 2008
The giant Argentinian is the youngest player currently in the top 10 and his
progress has been spectacular over the last year. Took Federer to the limit in
the French Open semi-final before losing in the Wimbledon second round to
Lleyton Hewitt. Won the Washington tournament earlier this month to underline
his threat, but fitness let him down in the Montreal Masters against Murray and
that could tell against him in New York where he lost in the quarter-finals last
year.
JO-WILFRIED TSONGA (FRA)
World ranking 7
Age: 24 (17.04.1985)
Birthplace: Le Mans, France
Residence: La Rippe, Switzerland
Height: 6'2" (188 cm), Weight: 200 lbs (91 kg)
Plays: Right-handed
Turned Pro 2004
Grand Slam Titles: 0
Career Tour Titles: 4
Best US Open result: Third round 2007, 08
The Frenchman won two tiles early in the year but failed to get past the fourth
round at either the French Open or Wimbledon. Has blown hot and cold in the
buildup to Flushing Meadows losing early in Washington before reaching the semi-
finals at the Montreal Masters where he lost a close one to Andy Murray. Tsonga
has yet to make it past the third round at the US Open but he was the junior
champion in New York in 2003 and loves the big occasion.
FERNANDO VERDASCO (ESP)
World ranking 10
Age: 25 (15.11.1983)
Birthplace: Madrid, Spain
Residence: Madrid, Spain
Height: 6'2" (188 cm), Weight: 179 lbs (81 kg)
Plays: Left-handed
Turned Pro 2001
Grand Slam titles: 0
Career Tour Titles 2
Best US Open result: Fourth round 2005
Stepped up a level at the start of the year with a run to the Australian Open
semi-finals where he took Nadal all the way before losing in five sets. Lost in
the fourth round at the French Open and Wimbledon and struggled since then until
the Montreal Masters where he was unlucky to lose to Roddick in a top quality
third round tie. Could be running into form at the right time for New York
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20090830.0304" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Two soldiers wounded in southern Philippine blast: military
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
zamboanga, Philippines, Aug 30, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Two soldiers were wounded in a bomb explosion in the restive southern Philippine
island of Jolo Sunday, the military said.
The improvised explosive device exploded early evening near the airport on Jolo,
in the country's southern tip and a known stronghold of Al-Qaeda-linked Abu
Sayyaf militants, the military said.
Both soldiers belonged to the army's engineering brigade. They were being
treated at a military hospital but the extent of their injuries was not readily
known.
No one has claimed responsibility for planting the improvised bomb, but previous
attacks have been blamed on the Abu Sayyaf.
The explosion took place amid a stepped up military operation against the group,
which has been blamed for the country's worst terrorist attacks.
The Abu Sayyaf is believed to have splintered into smaller groups hiding in the
jungles around Jolo. In January, they seized an Italian, a Swiss national and a
Filipina who were on a Red Cross humanitarian mission on the island.
Two were freed in April, but the last hostage, Eugenio Vagni of Italy was freed
only after six months in captivity.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20090914.0251" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Trial of US student accused in Italy sex-murder resumes
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Rome, Sept 14, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The trial of US exchange student Amanda Knox accused of killing her British
housemate during a drug-fueled sex game gone awry in 2007 resumed Monday in the
central Italian university town of Perugia.
Defence lawyers failed in a bid to have the case thrown out because of a long
delay in being given access to crucial DNA evidence, Italian media reported.
Central to the prosecutors' case against Knox and her then boyfriend Raffaele
Sollecito is the supposed murder weapon, a knife found in Sollecito's apartment
allegedly bearing Knox's DNA on the handle and the victim's DNA on the blade.
The trial resumed in the medieval walled town after a two-month summer recess.
Knox and Sollecito are accused along with a third defendant -- already convicted
and sentenced to 30 years in jail -- of killing 22-year-old Meredith Kercher
after she refused to join in a group sex session.
While claiming innocence, Rudy Guede of Ivory Coast, who worked as a casual
labourer in Perugia, had opted for a so-called "fast-track" trial limited to
evidence from the probe.
Both Knox and Sollecito have been held since a few days after Kercher was found
semi-nude in a pool of blood with her throat cut in the house in Perugia that
she shared with Knox.
In the prosecutors' scenario, Guede held Kercher down while Sollecito and Knox
stabbed her.
Kercher's family are seeking 30 million euros (40 million dollars) from the
alleged killers.
Two judges and six jurors will decide the fate of Knox and Sollecito, who face
30 years in prison if convicted. A verdict is expected later in the year.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20091006.0627" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
China's judiciary embroiled in graft scandals
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
beijing, Oct 6, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
"To get rich is glorious" has been the mantra in booming communist China for 30
years, but few have embraced the slogan more vigorously than Wen Qiang, a
leading law official in the country's southwest.
Wen, a former head of the judiciary and ex-vice police chief in Chongqing,
amassed assets valued at over 100 million yuan (14.7 million dollars), but now
stands accused of protecting crime bosses in exchange for gifts and kickbacks.
The 54-year-old is one of dozens of top judicial officials, including the former
vice head of China's top court, ensnared in high-stakes graft scandals despite
repeated Communist Party pledges and campaigns to stamp out corruption.
President Hu Jintao has said corruption is threatening the legitimacy of the
party, and the subject was a major focus of last month's annual meeting of its
key central committee, but observers say anti-graft efforts are falling short.
"When people like the vice head of the Supreme Court are accepting bribes and
engaging in corruption, you can draw your own conclusions over how serious the
corruption in China's judiciary is," Beijing lawyer Mo Shaoping told AFP.
"Corruption in the judiciary is pretty serious."
Wen, who became Chongqing's top judicial official last year after 16 years on
the police force, stands accused of protecting an intricate web of businessmen,
officials and mobsters in the city of over 30 million people.
According to state media, he has been charged with shielding businesses in
numerous sectors such as real estate, transportation, gambling and prostitution
as well as an illegal loan racket worth 30 billion yuan last year.
Up to 2,000 suspects have been placed under investigation in the case. At least
two dozen top city officials have been caught up in the crackdown, including the
vice president of Chongqing's high court, Zhang Tao.
"What is more shocking than Wen Qiang's ties with businessmen and the mafia is
the role which government officials at all levels played," the China Youth Daily
said in a commentary.
"If a string of government officials from top to bottom had not been linked
together to form bridges, then Wen Qiang would not have had the power nor the
ability to establish such a protection umbrella."
Just after Wen's case came to light, the ruling party expelled Huang Songyou,
the disgraced former vice head of China's Supreme People's Court, who was placed
under investigation for graft last year.
Huang, 51, allegedly helped to resolve a 400-million-yuan real estate case in
exchange for a large kickback when he was a top court official in southern
Guangdong province in the late 1990s, media reports said.
"The big issue for China is corruption -- corruption is related to the fact
there is no checks and balances mechanism on power," Joseph Cheng, a political
scientist at City University of Hong Kong, told AFP.
"This is related to the party wanting to maintain a monopoly on political power
and not being ready to adopt restraints on power. So it is a vicious circle that
is not allowing them to effectively fight corruption."
In its latest efforts to stamp out graft, the ruling party has said it will now
require officials to disclose their assets and their family's employment
situation, according to state media.
Cheng said disclosure would be helpful, but suggested that greater freedom in
the press to report on official corruption and more oversight from the nation's
rubber-stamp parliament would make anti-graft efforts more effective.
Mo, a high-profile Beijing rights lawyer whose firm often handles compensation
cases tied to land acquisition, said corruption was rife in both civil and
criminal courts, though bribery in civil cases was more common.
Top court officials in Beijing as well as Guangdong, Hubei and Liaoning
provinces have recently been convicted for taking money from attorneys in
exchange for favourable rulings.
The former vice head of Beijing's western district court, 58-year-old Guo
Shengqui, was sentenced to death with a two-year reprieve for taking bribes and
kickbacks from real estate developers and lawyers.
The two-year reprieve means that Guo's death penalty could be commuted to life
in prison if he behaves in prison and expresses remorse for his crimes.
"You can know the law and you can have a clear-cut case, but if the court is
really corrupt, then the law does not matter," said Mo.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20091012.0446" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Chronology of Abu Sayyaf kidnappings in the Philippines
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Manila, Oct 12, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The Abu Sayyaf group, which was set up in the 1990s allegedly with seed money
from Osama bin Laden's Al-Qaeda network, has been blamed for a string of
kidnappings in the Philippines.
Police also said they suspected the Abu Sayyaf may be responsible for the
kidnapping on Sunday of an Irish priest, Michael Sinnott, 78, in the troubled
south of the country.
Here is a chronology of the highest-profile kidnappings carried out by the Abu
Sayyaf, or gangs linked to it:
January 15, 2009: International Committee of the Red Cross workers Andreas
Notter of Switzerland, Eugenio Vagni of Italy and Filipina Mary Jean Lacaba are
kidnapped while on a humanitarian mission on Jolo island. Notter and Lacaba were
freed in April, while Vagni was released in July.
June 2008: Popular local television news anchor Ces Drilon and two crew members
seized and held for several days while working on a story about the Abu Sayyaf.
June 2007: Italian priest Giancarlo Bossi of the Pontifical Institute of Foreign
Missions is kidnapped by men with ties to the Abu Sayyaf. He is freed a month
later allegedly after a ransom payment, which he denied.
October 2001: Italian priest Giuseppe Pierantoni of the Sacred Heart order is
kidnapped by men with links to Abu Sayyaf. He was freed after six months in
captivity, during which he said he lived off snake and lizard meat.
May 2001: Abu Sayyaf rebels raid the Dos Palmas beach resort on Palawan island,
abducting 20 people, including American missionaries Martin and Gracia Burnham,
and compatriot Guillermo Sobero. Sobero was beheaded the following month, while
Martin Burnham and a Filipina nurse also held captive were killed a year later
in a military rescue. Gracia was freed in the rescue operation. The other 16
hostages were released earlier after ransoms were paid.
August 2000: Jeffrey Schilling, an American convert to Islam, walked into an Abu
Sayyaf lair on Jolo island after marrying a Filipino Muslim woman he met on the
Internet. The bride turned out be related to an Abu Sayyaf rebel. He was rescued
by the military after more than six months.
April 2000: Abu Sayyaf militants launch a daring cross-border raid, abducting 21
European and Asian hostages from a resort in Sipadan, Malaysia. All were freed
one after the other in a year-long hostage crisis that also saw many foreign
journalists covering the crisis being kidnapped and released.
September 1998: Italian priest Luciano Benedetti is kidnapped and released after
eight weeks in captivity, reportedly only after a ransom was paid.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20091115.0232" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Japanese chef scoops top award in London
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
LONDON, Nov 15, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Tomoyuki Abe of Japanese restaurant chain Sushizen was named best chef at a
sushi awards ceremony in London late Saturday.
The Eat-Japan Sushi Awards 2009 featured seven of the world's best sushi chefs
preparing their favourite dishes. Invited guests then tasted the foods before
picking the winner through a ballot.
The event, described by organisers as "the Oscars of the sushi world", was won
last year by Mitsunori Kusakabe of the Sushi Ran restaurant in California,
United States.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20091201.0059" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Knox flirtation changed course of probe: defence
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
perugia, Italy, Dec 1, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A flirtatious gesture by US student Amanda Knox caught an investigator's eye and
changed the course of the probe into the 2007 sex murder of her housemate, a
defence lawyer said Tuesday.
"Without the famous come-on... she wouldn't be here today" standing trial for
the slaying of Briton Meredith Kercher, said Carlo Dalla Vedova.
Investigators say that the day after the gruesome murder of 21-year-old Kercher,
Knox swivelled her hips suggestively while donning anti-contamination shoe-
covers at the scene of the crime.
Presenting closing arguments just three days ahead of the expected verdict in
the sensational trial, Dalla Vedova said the media frenzy it sparked had
vilified Knox and invaded her privacy.
Raising his voice, Dalla Vedova said: "Amanda is a wholesome young woman!"
Knox, 22, dressed in black with her hair pulled back in a single French braid,
listened impassively as her parents Curt Knox and Edda Mellas, seated behind
her, followed proceedings with the help of an interpreter.
Curt Knox told reporters afterward that Dalla Vedova's summing up was "another
step in the right direction," the ANSA news agency reported. "We hope to take
another step forward tomorrow."
The defence will complete its closing arguments on Wednesday, with rebuttals
scheduled Thursday.
Knox and her co-defendant, former boyfriend Raffaele Sollecito, 25, have been in
custody since a few days after the murder of the 21-year-old exchange student
from Coulsdon, south of London, on November 1, 2007.
Kercher, an aspiring teacher, was found semi-nude with multiple stab wounds to
her neck in her bedroom the following morning.
She and Knox, both students at Perugia's prestigious University for Foreigners,
shared a cottage in the hilltop Umbrian city with two Italian women who were
away for the holiday weekend.
Prosecutors say Kercher refused to join in a drug-fuelled sex game in which Knox
was the driving force, conducting a "crescendo of violence" that led to
Kercher's brutal death.
They have said DNA and other forensic evidence incriminate Knox and Sollecito
and have requested life sentences for the pair.
The slaying dented the university's reputation, while residents are eager for
the end of the trial, which began in January.
"It has caused real chaos," one student told AFP.
She was among a dozen students around a long table at a pizzeria in the centre
of the medieval walled city who said she thought Knox was guilty. Another three
said she was innocent, while one abstained from the straw poll.
The defence argued Monday that all evidence pointed to a sole killer, Rudy
Guede, an Ivorian immigrant convicted separately of the grisly crime in a so-
called "fast-track" trial limited to evidence from the probe.
Kercher's family is seeking 25 million euros (37 million dollars) in damages
from Knox, Sollecito and Guede.
Knox also faces a defamation suit from her former employer, Congolese bar owner
Patrick Lumumba, who was held for two weeks after she accused him under
interrogation.
Knox charged that aggressive police questioning led her to accuse Lumumba of the
murder.
Dalla Vedova noted Tuesday that the Italian state had already paid damages of
8,000 euros to Lumumba, and that Knox had said "'I'm sorry' so many times, and
'I don't know how I can look Lumumba in the eye'."
But Lumumba's lawyer Carlo Pacelli slammed the remarks, saying Knox had told her
mother, in a recorded conversation 10 days after the murder, that "she felt
terrible because she accused Patrick knowing he was innocent."
Pacelli told AFP: "But she didn't go to the police, or the magistrate or anyone
else to change her declaration."
Two judges and six jurors are expected to reach a verdict late Friday.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20091207.0198" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Family vows to get US student Knox out of Italian jail
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
washington, Dec 7, 2009 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The mother of US student Amanda Knox said Monday that she promised her daughter
that "we will fight" for her release, as the young woman began serving a 26-year
prison term for murdering her British housemate in Italy.
Edda Mellas was able to visit her jailed daughter over the weekend, hours after
Knox was convicted by two judges and six Italian jurors of murdering British
exchange student Meredith Kercher in the cottage the two young women shared in
Perugia, Mellas said in an interview with US television.
"You will get out of here. Don't worry. Keep your chin up and have courage,"
Mellas said she told her 22-year-old daughter.
"We need to be strong for Amanda. We will fight for her and she will get out of
here," Mellas told ABC television.
Knox's family was present when the verdict was read out, but not speaking
Italian, they were able to glean only from the reaction of others in the Perugia
courtroom that the young woman had been found guilty.
"I heard someone gasping in the audience, back where the public stood," Mellas
said.
"I heard, 'No, no.' Then I heard other people weeping back in the public area
and I thought, 'wow,'" said Mellas.
"And then I could see Amanda. She put her head down and she started to cry," an
emotional Mellas said.
"I cried. Some of the lawyers were crying. It was chaos," Mellas said.
Knox was sentenced last week to 26 years in jail and co-defendant Raffaele
Sollecito, her new boyfriend at the time of the murder two years ago, received a
sentence of 25 years for their roles in Kercher's murder.
Prosecutors presented DNA and other forensic evidence against Knox, Sollecito
and a third person, Rudy Guede of Ivory Coast, who was convicted separately
after opting for a "fast-track" trial in exchange for clemency.
The prosecution alleged that the three young people were high on drugs when they
tried to engage Kercher, 21, in a sex game that turned violent, leaving her dead
with stab wounds to the neck.
Knox's family has vowed to appeal the verdict.
"We will do whatever it takes to support Amanda," her mother said.
"All over the world -- and this isn't just Italy, it's the United States, it's
everywhere -- truly innocent people are found guilty, and this is one of those
cases. She's innocent," Mellas said.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100124.0348" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Ex-judicial official to be tried in China mafia case: report
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Beijing, Jan 24, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The top official ensnared in a mafia crackdown in southwest China will go on
trial in February, state press reported Sunday, the latest in a series of
sensational mob trials that have gripped the nation.
Wen Qiang, a former top judicial official in Chongqing municipality, will be
tried on February 2, as the city of over 30 million seeks to wrap up scores of
cases linking the government to organised crime, the China News Service said.
Wen, who also served for 16-years as a top Chongqing police official, stands
accused of protecting an intricate web of businessmen, officials and mobsters in
a case involving sordid tales of sex, gambling and graft in the city.
Besides being charged with accepting bribes and owning huge amounts of money and
assets he could not explain, Wen, 54, has also been charged with rape, People's
Daily reported last week.
Other defendants to be tried with Wen include his wife and at least three top
former Chongqing policemen, the report said.
Since the mafia crackdown in Chongqing began last June, charges have been
brought against 782 people in 78 cases, including 87 government officials, the
report said. Over 3,300 have been detained in the crackdown.
According to earlier reports, Wen shielded businesses in numerous sectors such
as real estate, transportation, gambling and prostitution as well as an illegal
loan racket worth 30 billion yuan (4.4 billion dollars).
A once defiant Wen -- who amassed assets valued at over 100 million yuan by
allegedly taking kickbacks from crime bosses -- had confessed to his crimes and
expressed remorse since his arrest, the Yangzi Evening News reported last year.
He has also confessed to affairs with his female underlings, as well as trysts
with Chinese entertainment starlets, some of whom he allegedly raped, the paper
added.
The confession of his infidelities sparked his angry wife to lead police to a
hidden cache of 20 million yuan buried in a remote rural fish pond, numerous
press reports said.
Wen's sister-in-law, Xie Caiping, was sentenced to 18 years in prison last year
for running up to 20 gambling dens in Chongqing hotels and paying off police to
turn a blind eye to her criminal activities that included illegal drug use.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100131.0007" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Head of US group held in Haiti says 'intentions were good'
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Port-au-Prince, Jan 31, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The head of a US-based charity, who along with nine other members are being held
in Haiti for allegedly trying to take 33 children out of the country, said
Sunday that the group's aims were entirely altruistic.
"We came here literally to just help the children. Our intentions were good,"
Laura Silsby, head of an Idaho-based charity called New Life Children's Refuge,
told AFP.
"We wanted to help those who lost parents in the quake or were abandoned," she
said in her detention cell.
The director of the Haitian center where the children are being cared for said
earlier Sunday, however, that most of the youngsters insist their parents are
still alive.
"We just wanted to help children that had no one else to care for them," Silsby
said from the police detention facility near Port-au-Prince's international
airport.
The US embassy here said the group were being held for "alleged violations of
Haitian laws related to immigration."
Police arrested the five men and five women with US passports, as well as two
Haitians, as they tried to cross into the neighboring Dominican Republic with 33
children late Friday.
Silsby declines to provide further details of their detention, and said she did
not know how the group's case would proceed under the Haitian justice system in
the coming days.
Haitian officials have voiced fears that child traffickers could take advantage
of the chaos after Haiti's massive January 12 quake to slip out of the country
with children in illegal adoption schemes.
There is also concern that legitimate adoption agencies may rush to take
earthquake orphans out of the country before proper checks have been conducted
to confirm their parents perished.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100201.0617" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Chinese cop sentenced to death in mafia trial
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Beijing, Feb 1, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A former police officer in China was sentenced to death on Monday in the latest
court verdict following a huge mafia crackdown that has lifted the lid on
official collusion with gangsters.
Yue Cun was convicted of crimes including operating a range of illegal
businesses and causing intentional injury in the huge municipality of Chongqing
in southwestern China, the official China News Service said.
At least six people have already been sentenced to death in the sensational
trials in Chongqing, home to 30 million people, but Yue appeared to be the first
police officer given the death penalty.
Calls to the court went unanswered.
The Chongqing crackdown comes amid a nationwide push to stamp out rampant
corruption, which President Hu Jintao has described as one of the greatest
threats to the legitimacy of Communist Party rule.
State press reported last month that the top official ensnared in the crackdown,
Wen Qiang, would go on trial on Tuesday.
Wen, 54, is a former top Chongqing police and judicial official who stands
accused of protecting an intricate web of businessmen, officials and mobsters.
The trials have grabbed headlines nationwide with their sordid tales of sex,
gambling and graft in the city of 30 million people.
Besides being charged with accepting bribes and possessing huge amounts of money
and assets he could not explain, Wen has also been charged with rape, the
People's Daily newspaper has reported.
Since the crackdown began last June, charges have been brought against hundreds
of people, including 87 government officials, in scores of cases, the People's
Daily said.
More than 3,300 people have been detained in the crackdown.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100202.0622" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Top China justice official in dock on mob charges
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Beijing, Feb 2, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The most senior official charged in a major crackdown on organised crime and
graft in southwestern China went on trial Tuesday in the climax of a lurid,
sensational court marathon.
Wen Qiang, former director of the justice department in the giant city of
Chongqing, stands accused of accepting bribes, protecting mafia rings and four
counts of rape, a court statement said.
He was being tried along with his wife and three top police officials in
proceedings that began early Tuesday and were expected to last five days, said
the statement by the No. 5 Intermediate People's Court.
Wen, 54, along with his wife Zhou Xiaoya, is accused of accepting 15 million
yuan (2.2 million dollars) in bribes.
Previous state press reports have alleged that Wen, who was also once a top-
ranked Chongqing police department official, raped a string of women including
B-list film and music starlets.
Such lurid details, along with widespread speculation the crackdown was linked
to political manoeuvring at the apex of the ruling Communist Party, have gripped
the nation since trials began late last year.
The case has come to symbolise China's struggle against rampant corruption and
expanding organised crime.
The Communist Party has railed against graft for years, seeking to counter
public anger over regular reports of larcenous officials and stories of excess
and debauchery among party leaders.
President Hu Jintao himself has repeatedly warned that graft threatens to
undermine the party's legitimacy.
The crackdown is widely seen as a bid by Bo Xilai -- who was appointed party
secretary of Chongqing in 2007 and is considered one of the party's most popular
and charismatic figures -- to move up in the national hierarchy.
Bo, a former commerce minister and son of revolutionary elder Bo Yibo, is
believed to be angling for a spot on the nine-member Politburo Standing
Committee, the top national leadership, said China politics analyst Willy Lam.
"Bo Xilai is making a last-ditch bid to get into the Politburo Standing
Committee in 2012. He is 60 years old, so this is probably his last chance,"
said Lam, of the Chinese University of Hong Kong.
At least seven people have been reported executed or sentenced to death in the
trials, which have shocked the public by exposing the impunity enjoyed by mafia
kingpins as they terrorised Chongqing and lived debauched lifestyles.
In November, Wen's sister-in-law Xie Caiping, 46, was sentenced to 18 years in
prison on charges ranging from running illegal gambling dens to drug dealing.
Dubbed the "Godmother" by Chinese media, Xie reportedly drove a Mercedes-Benz,
owned several luxury villas and kept a stable of 16 young men to provide her
with sexual services.
The crackdown also has seen a former senior judge who was awaiting trial, 57
-year-old Wu Xiaoqing, hang himself in jail, state media reports said in
November.
In a sign of the public interest in the case, the court received applications
from 72 media organisations from across the nation seeking to attend Wen's
trial, according to cqnews.net, a local Chongqing news website.
Crowds were seen outside the venue of Wen's trial on Tuesday but no disturbances
were reported amid heavy security.
During previous trials, crowds have gathered outside Chongqing courthouses, with
some claiming to be victims of the mobs and calling for harsh punishment for the
accused, earlier press reports said.
The Southern Metropolitan Daily, quoting people close to the case, said  Wen's
trial would be open for the first four days but closed on the fifth as it hears
the rape charges, to protect the identity of those involved.
It said that despite the reports of Wen assaulting entertainment starlets, he
was likely only to be tried for raping a college student whose name has not been
revealed.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100207.0465" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Trial of top China official accused of mob links ends
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Beijing, Feb 7, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The trial of a former top Chinese official accused of gangster links, rape and
taking bribes ended Sunday, the court said, bringing to a close the highest-
profile case yet of a huge mafia crackdown.
A verdict on the case of Wen Qiang, former justice department director in the
southwestern city of Chongqing, would be announced at an undisclosed, later
date, the No. 5 Intermediate People's Court said in a statement.
Wen, 54, is the highest-ranking official to appear in the dock in a string of
prosecutions over corruption and mafia crime in the sprawling city that has
gripped the nation with lurid details of sex and violence.
At least nine people have been reported executed or sentenced to death in the
trials, which have shocked the public by exposing the impunity enjoyed by mafia
kingpins as they terrorised Chongqing and lived debauched lifestyles.
Wen, who was also once a top police official in the city, has been charged with
accepting more than two million dollars in bribes, protecting mafia rings and
four counts of rape, a previous court statement said.
The trial began on Tuesday and ended in the early hours of Sunday after hours of
legal sparring.
Evidence and testimony related to the allegations of bribery and mafia
protection were heard in open court, but the section devoted to the rape charges
took place behind closed doors, the court statement said.
Wen was on trial with four other people, including his wife.
A report by the official Xinhua news agency said Wen's lawyer rejected a lot of
the evidence pertaining to alleged bribe-taking, and had pleaded not guilty to
his client protecting mafia rings.
According to the China News Service, Wen said in court that much of the money he
received was New Year or birthday gifts. He also denied providing any help to
mafia groups.
According to the state-run Beijing News, Wen's lawyer has said a verdict will be
announced after the Chinese Lunar New Year holiday, which kicks off on February
13 and ends six days later.
In November, Wen's sister-in-law Xie Caiping was sentenced to 18 years in prison
on charges of running illegal gambling dens and drug dealing.
She reportedly drove a Mercedes-Benz, owned several luxury villas and kept a
stable of 16 young men to provide her with sexual services.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100228.0258" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Taliban claim responsibility for Pakistan suicide attack
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Miranshah, Pakistan, Feb 28, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The Pakistani Taliban claimed responsibility on Sunday for a suicide attack on a
police station in the northwestern district of Karak that killed 4 people
including two policemen.
In addition to the dead, more than two dozen people were wounded, most of them
police officers, when an attacker detonated a pick-up van on Saturday at the
gate of the main police station in Karak, in North-West Frontier Province.
"We have done this," Taliban spokesman Azam Tariq told AFP by telephone from an
undisclosed location. "Both the police and army are equal for us. Both are our
enemies. They are responsible for the cruelties on us. We will carry out more
such attacks against police."
Karak lies 150 kilometres (94 miles) southeast of Peshawar, the capital of
North-West Frontier Province.
The Pakistani Taliban have claimed and been blamed for most of the bomb and
suicide attacks to have taken place in Pakistan. Such attacks have killed more
than 3,000 people since July 2007.
Pakistan's military has launched a number of offensives against militants in the
tribal belt, which according to the United States has effectively become the
headquarters of Al-Qaeda.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100305.0126" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Knox's parents kick off appeal against Italian court decision
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Rome, March 5, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The parents of American Amanda Knox, convicted in the 2007 murder of her British
housemate in Italy, Friday launched an appeal after the judge spelt out his
reasons for sending her to jail for 26 years.
"There is a substantial basis for the appeal and we have faith that this will
bring about a reversal of a wrongful conviction," Edda Mellas and Curt Knox said
in a statement carried by the ANSA news agency.
Judge Giancarlo Massei said in a legal opinion published Thursday that evidence
presented during the year-long trial gave a "comprehensive and solid picture,
without gaps or inconsistencies" leading to guilty verdicts for Knox and her
then-boyfriend Raffaele Sollecito.
The sensational sex-murder of Briton Meredith Kercher was carried out "with no
planning, no animosity or rancour against the victim," Massei wrote in the
427-page opinion issued three months after the verdict and also signed by co-
judge Beatrice Cristiani.
Mellas and Knox said the conviction was "not supported by evidence," and that
the opinion contained "numerous incongrouences and contradictions."
"We know our daughter is innocent," they added.
"There is no scientific proof that places Amanda in Meredith's room, no proof
that she was on the scene of this terrible crime," the statement said.
Knox family lawyer Carlo Dalla Vedova said Thursday the opinion was "full of
contradictions and unproven assertions."
Speaking to AFP by telephone from Perugia, he said: "We are still analysing
it... (but) we will contest the illogical elements," he said, calling for new
scientific tests.
Knox, now 22, and Sollecito, an Italian engineering student who is now 25, were
convicted of murdering Kercher, 21, in a drug-fueled sex game that turned
violent on the night of November 1, 2007, in the central university town of
Perugia.
A third person, Rudy Guede of Ivory Coast, now 23, had already been convicted
separately in the case under a "fast-track" procedure.
Kercher was found semi-nude in a pool of blood under a duvet with multiple stab
wounds to the neck in her room in the cottage she shared with Knox and two other
women, who were away for the long All Saints Day weekend.
The crime came about because of a combination of "purely random" circumstances,
notably that both Knox and Sollecito were free that evening, they "ran into"
Guede and went to the house where Kercher was alone, it said.
The opinion also asserted that Knox "freely accused Patrick Diya Lumumba of
having killed Meredith and accused him knowing of (his) innocence".
Knox was sentenced to 26 years in jail, while Sollecito got 25.
The extra year for Knox was in punishment for defaming Lumumba, who spent two
weeks in prison before being released without charge.
The Italian court came under harsh criticism from many who felt Knox, a native
of Seattle, Washington, was convicted only on circumstantial evidence and that
the Italian press, which jurors were free to read, had assassinated her
character.
A diplomatic furore arose after the verdict prompted a senator from Washington
state to charge that Italy's judicial system was "flawed".
Knox herself later told a visiting Italian lawmaker that she felt her "rights
were respected" in the trial and that it was "carried out correctly".
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100409.0256" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Fort Hood shooting suspect moved to jail: US military
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
WASHINGTON, April 9, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The US Army psychiatrist charged in the Fort Hood shooting rampage has been
transferred from a hospital to a local jail, the military said on Friday.
"Major Nidal Hasan was released from Brooke Army Medical Center and transported
to the Bell County Jail overnight," said an army statement.
Paralyzed from the chest down, Hasan had been held in custody at the hospital in
San Antonio, Texas, since the November 5 shooting that left 13 people dead at
the Fort Hood base.
Authorities say Hasan was paralyzed after civilian police shot him, trying to
halt the rampage.
Hasan is being investigated for links to Islamic extremism, including his
contacts with a radical cleric who blessed the killing spree.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100427.0688" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
US missionary to face trial in Haiti: attorney
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
PORT-AU-PRINCE, April 26, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The US woman at the center of a major scandal here after she and several fellow
missionaries tried to spirit dozens of Haitian children into the Dominican
Republic is to be tried in Haiti, her attorney told AFP on Monday.
Laura Silsby, one of a group of missionaries from the western US state of Idaho,
was detained at the border with the Dominican Republic on kidnapping charges
following the devastating earthquake in Haiti.
She now will stand trial on the charge of arranging "irregular travel,"
according to her attorney, Louis Ricardo Chachoutte, who spoke to reporters
following a court hearing Monday.
Silsby and her fellow Baptist missionaries were arrested on January 29 as they
tried to take the children into the neighboring Dominican Republic by bus
without the necessary documentation.
Haitian authorities later determined that all 33 children that the US
missionaries tried to remove from the country illegally had parents, with whom
they were eventually reunited.
The members of the New Life Children's Refuge missionary group denied
wrongdoing, saying they were only trying to help orphans in the wake of Haiti's
devastating January 12 earthquake that killed more than 220,000 people.
The other nine missionaries were all released and allowed to return to the
United States, but Silsby, the leader of the group, remained detained in Port-
au-Prince.
crs-sab/sg/ao
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100513.0197" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Libya plane crash boy survivor getting better: doctor
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
tripoli, May 13, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Dutch boy who miraculously survived a Libyan plane crash that killed 103
people, including his parents, greeted relatives with a smile as they arrived to
comfort him, a doctor said on Thursday.
The boy, identified as "Ruben" by the Dutch foreign ministry but more fully by
Dutch media as nine-year-old Ruben van Assouw, is recovering after surgery to
his smashed legs, the doctor treating him in Tripoli said.
Dr Siddiq ben Dilla told AFP the boy, who was the sole survivor when the plane
crashed on landing at Tripoli airport on Wednesday, recognised his relatives and
smiled when they entered his hospital room.
"His family is with him now," he said. "His memory is good: as soon as his
relatives walked in he smiled, and was happy to see them.
"He is getting better, is beginning to talk again and has asked for food,"
Dilla told AFP. "Compared with yesterday he's very good. We have repaired all
his fractures -- effectively several operations in one."
Earlier a Dutch foreign ministry spokesman said an uncle and an aunt arrived in
Tripoli on Thursday on a Netherlands government plane and were taken to the
hospital "to make sure that Ruben will see family faces next to his bed."
Foreign Minister Maxime Verhagen said: "He was, of course, after the disaster he
experienced, after the great loss of his parents and brother, happy to see two
familiar faces at his bedside.
"His condition is stable but it is not yet possible to transport him," Verhagen
added.
The boy's doctor said that if his health continued to improve, he should have
recovered enough to be flown home in the next couple of days.
Dutch newspaper Brabants Dagblad said the boy was probably Ruben van Assouw from
Tilburg in the southern Netherlands who had been on safari in South Africa with
his mother Trudy, 41, father Patrick, 40, and brother Enzo, 11.
The paper quoted his grandmother An van de Sande as saying that the holiday had
been to celebrate the couple's copper wedding anniversary -- marked in the
Netherlands after 12.5 years.
"We don't understand. It's like we're in a film," she was quoted as saying.
Libyan Transport Minister Mohammed Ali Zidan said a total of 103 people -- 92
passengers of nine nationalities and an 11-strong Libyan crew -- died when the
Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A330 coming from Johannesburg disintegrated on landing.
The Dutch ministry said on Thursday that 70 Dutch nationals were among the dead,
while a diplomat said relatives from the Netherlands have been flown to Libya
courtesy of Afriqiyah to identify the bodies and prepare their repatriation.
A ministry statement added that "the family of the nine-year-old Ruben, the sole
survivor of the disaster," were among those who perished.
Johannesburg private Talk Radio 702 reported on Thursday that at least 10 South
Africans died in the crash.
The Belgian foreign ministry said two of its nationals died, one of them a
resident of the Netherlands.
Zidan said the rest of the dead included passengers from Britain, France,
Finland, Germany, the Philippines and Zimbabwe, although he could not give a
breakdown of their numbers. It was unclear how many were dual nationals.
With the plane's black boxes recovered, investigators from manufacturers Airbus
and France, where the plane was built, have also flown to join the inquiry led
by Libya, which has ruled out terrorism as the cause of the crash.
Witnesses spoke of the aircraft inexplicably breaking up as it came in to land
in clear weather.
"It is too soon to know the causes of the accident," Sabri Shadi, the chairman
of the board of Afriqiyah Airways, said about the probe.
"Several committees have been set up to investigate and we need some time before
we can draw any conclusions.
"A preliminary report should be published in the next few days but definitive
results will not be known for several days, even weeks."
Shadi was speaking after a first meeting of the team, which US investigators
were to join on Friday.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100513.0231" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Sole Libyan crash survivor loses parents, brother: report
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
The Hague, May 13, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A nine-year-old Dutch boy, sole survivor of the Tripoli plane crash that killed
103 people, lost his parents and brother in an horrific end to a dream African
safari, officials said Thursday.
The boy, identified by the foreign ministry only as Ruben, was visited a day
after the crash by an aunt and uncle flown into Tripoli by the Dutch government,
and smiled when he saw them, said the foreign ministry.
"He was of course after the disaster he experienced, after the great loss of his
parents and brother, happy to see two familiar faces at his bedside," Foreign
Minister Maxime Verhagen told journalists.
"His condition is stable but it is not yet possible to transport him."
The ministry refused to reveal the surname of the boy, who hails from the
southern city of Tilburg, to protect the family's privacy, but a regional daily
newspaper said he was probably Ruben van Assouw.
The Brabants Daily quoted his grandmother An van de Sande as saying the boy had
been on a South African safari with his brother Enzo, 11, mother Trudy, 41, and
father Patrick, 40, to celebrate the couple's copper wedding anniversary --
marked in the Netherlands after 12.5 years.
"We don't understand. It's like we're in a film," Van de Sande said.
Verhagen confirmed that the survivor's father, mother and 11-year-old brother
were among 70 Dutch citizens who perished when an Afriqiyah Airways plane from
Johannesburg disintegrated on landing around 6:00 am (0400 GMT) at Tripoli
airport on Wednesday.
The Dutch tour operators federation, ANWB, said it had sent a team to Tripoli
from Brussels on Thursday that included a trauma psychologist and an intensive
care nurse to assess the boy's condition and bring him home.
"Their task is to assess the boy's psychological and physical condition, to see
how he can be brought back to the Netherlands, and when," spokesman Ad Vonk told
AFP.
Earlier, the boy's doctor said he had come round after surgery for his smashed
legs and was in a stable condition but confused.
"The child underwent several rounds of surgery to his legs. He had simple
fractures and double fractures," the doctor said on Libyan state television,
which also showed pictures of the boy's legs in casts.
"He woke up (late Wednesday night) and is in good condition," the doctor said.
Meanwhile, forensic experts and consular staff arrived in Tripoli on Thursday
morning to help identify the dead and provide support on the ground, said
foreign ministry spokesman Francesco Mascini.
The Dutch Safety Board, an autonomous body, said it had sent two investigators
to "observe" the Libyan investigation into the crash.
"They may do no independent investigation", a statement said, but were allowed
under international regulations to visit the crash site and have access to all
the evidence.
Dutch Prime Minister Jan Peter Balkenende and Verhagen met next-of-kin of the 70
victims on Thursday afternoon, in what the minister later described as a "an
emotional meeting".
He urged all relatives to stay in the Netherlands "because they are needed to
help gather information required for identification purposes", including
providing DNA material.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100513.0306" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Libya plane crash boy survivor getting better: doctor
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
tripoli, May 13, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Dutch boy who miraculously survived a Libyan plane crash that killed 103
people, including his parents, greeted relatives with a smile as they arrived to
comfort him, a doctor said on Thursday.
The boy, identified as "Ruben" by the Dutch foreign ministry but more fully by
Dutch media as nine-year-old Ruben van Assouw, is recovering after surgery to
his smashed legs, the doctor treating him in Tripoli said.
Dr Siddiq ben Dilla told AFP the boy, who was the sole survivor when the plane
crashed on landing at Tripoli airport on Wednesday, recognised his relatives and
smiled when they entered his hospital room.
"His family is with him now," he said. "His memory is good: as soon as his
relatives walked in he smiled, and was happy to see them.
"He is getting better, is beginning to talk again and has asked for food,"
Dilla told AFP. "Compared with yesterday he's very good. We have repaired all
his fractures -- effectively several operations in one."
Earlier a Dutch foreign ministry spokesman said an uncle and an aunt arrived in
Tripoli on Thursday on a Netherlands government plane and were taken to the
hospital "to make sure that Ruben will see family faces next to his bed."
"He could be repatriated in the next couple of days if his health continues to
improve," Dilla said.
Ruben would be flown home "as soon as his medical condition allows," Dutch
foreign ministry spokesman Christoph Prommersberger told AFP, adding that the
boy was doing "reasonably well."
The two hospital visitors confirmed the boy was their nephew, another spokesman
for the ministry said, adding that the family's name would not be confirmed "to
respect their family life."
Dutch newspaper Brabants Dagblad said the boy was probably Ruben van Assouw from
Tilburg in the southern Netherlands who had been on safari in South Africa with
his mother Trudy, 41, father Patrick, 40, and brother Enzo, 11.
Also on board the Dutch government plane to Tripoli were forensic experts,
consular staff and transport ministry staff, the foreign ministry said.
Libyan Transport Minister Mohammed Ali Zidan said a total of 103 people -- 92
passengers of nine nationalities and an 11-strong Libyan crew -- died when an
Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A330 coming from Johannesburg disintegrated on landing.
The Dutch ministry said on Thursday that 70 Dutch nationals were among the dead,
while a diplomat said relatives from the Netherlands have been flown to Libya
courtesy of Afriqiyah to identify the bodies and prepare their repatriation.
A ministry statement added that "the family of the nine-year-old Ruben, the sole
survivor of the disaster," were among those who perished.
Johannesburg private Talk Radio 702 reported on Thursday that at least 10 South
Africans died in the crash.
Zidan said the rest of the dead included two Germans as well as passengers from
Britain, France, Finland, the Philippines and Zimbabwe, although he could not
give a breakdown of their numbers.
In Berlin, a foreign ministry spokesman confirmed that at least one German was
among the dead.
With the plane's black boxes recovered, investigators from manufacturers Airbus
and France, where the plane was built, have also flown to join the inquiry led
by Libya, which has ruled out terrorism as the cause of the crash.
Witnesses spoke of the aircraft inexplicably breaking up as it came in to land
in clear weather.
"It is too soon to know the causes of the accident," Sabri Shadi, the chairman
of the board of Afriqiyah Airways, said about the probe.
"Several committees have been set up to investigate and we need some time before
we can draw any conclusions," he said.
"A preliminary report should be published in the next few days but definitive
results will not be know for several days, even weeks," he added.
Shadi said that after a first meeting of the team, which US investigators were
to join on Friday. The crash scene, meanwhile, has been placed under police
guard.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100513.0426" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Libya plane crash boy survivor stable but confused: doctor
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
tripoli, May 13, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Dutch boy who miraculously survived a Libyan plane crash that killed 103
people including his parents is confused but stable, a doctor said Thursday, as
relatives arrived in Tripoli to comfort him.
The boy, identified only as "Ruben" by the Dutch foreign ministry but more fully
named by the Dutch media as nine-year-old Ruben van Assouw, has come round after
surgery to his smashed legs, the doctor treating him in a Tripoli hospital said.
"He woke up (late Wednesday night) and is in good condition," the doctor said,
while stressing that the boy, the sole survivor of Wednesday's disaster, was
confused and "still is not reacting well to his surroundings."
"The child underwent several rounds of surgery to his legs. He had simple
fractures and double fractures," the doctor said on Libyan state television,
which also showed pictures of Ruben's legs in casts.
A Dutch foreign ministry spokesman said an uncle and an aunt arrived in Tripoli
Thursday on a Netherlands government plane and were taken to the hospital "to
make sure that Ruben will see family faces next to his bed."
According to the Dutch NOS public broadcaster, the boy recognised his family and
smiled when they entered his hospital room.
Ruben would be flown back home "as soon as his medical condition allows," the
spokesman said.
Ministry spokesman Christoph Prommersberger told AFP that Ruben was doing
"reasonably well."
"A colleague from the embassy (in Tripoli) was able to speak with him. He told
her he was Ruben, nine years old, from the city of Tilburg," Prommersberger
said. "He is not in a critical condition."
Dutch newspaper Babants Dagblad said the boy was likely Ruben van Assouw from
Tilburg in the southern Netherlands who had been on safari in South Africa with
his mother Trudy, 41, father Patrick, 40, and his brother Enzo, 11.
Also on board the Dutch government plane to Tripoli were forensic experts,
consular staff and transport ministry staff, the foreign ministry said.
Libya's Transport Minister Mohammed Ali Zidan said a total of 103 people -- 92
passengers of nine nationalities and an 11-strong Libyan crew -- died when an
Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A330 coming from Johannesburg disintegrated on landing
at Tripoli airport.
The Dutch ministry said on Thursday that 70 Dutch nationals were among the dead,
while a diplomat said family members from the Netherlands have been flown in to
Libya courtesy of Afriqiyah to identify the bodies and prepare their
repatriation.
The ministry added in a statement that "the family of the nine-year-old Ruben,
the sole survivor of the disaster", were among those who perished.
Johannesburg private Talk Radio 702 reported on Thursday that at least 10 South
Africans died in the crash.
Libya's transport minister said the rest of the dead included two Germans as
well as passengers from Britain, France, Finland, the Philippines and Zimbabwe,
although he could not give a breakdown of their numbers.
With the plane's black boxes recovered, investigators from manufacturers Airbus
and France where the plane was built have also flown to join the inquiry led by
Libya, which has ruled out terrorism as the cause of Wednesday's crash.
Witnesses spoke of the aircraft inexplicably breaking up as it came in to land
in clear weather.
"It is too soon to know the causes of the accident," Sabri Shadi, the chairman
of the board of Afriqiyah Airways, said about the probe into the crash.
"Several committees have been set up to investigate and we need some time before
we can draw any conclusions," he said.
"A preliminary report should be published in the next few days but definitive
results will not be know for several days, even weeks," the chairman added.
Shadi said that after a first meeting which grouped the team that US
investigators were to join the probe on Friday. The crash scene, meanwhile, has
been placed under police guard.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100513.0449" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Libya plane crash boy survivor stable but confused: doctor
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
tripoli, May 13, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Dutch boy who miraculously survived a Libyan plane crash that killed 103
people including his parents is confused but stable, a doctor said Thursday, as
relatives arrived in Tripoli to comfort him.
The boy, identified only as "Ruben" by the Dutch foreign ministry but more fully
named by the Dutch media as nine-year-old Ruben van Assouw, has come round after
surgery to his smashed legs, the doctor treating him in a Tripoli hospital said.
"He woke up (late Wednesday night) and is in good condition," the doctor said,
while stressing that the boy was confused and "still is not reacting well to his
surroundings."
"The child underwent several rounds of surgery to his legs. He had simple
fractures and double fractures," the doctor said on Libyan state television,
which also showed pictures of the boy's legs in casts.
A Dutch foreign ministry spokesman said an uncle and an aunt arrived in Tripoli
Thursday on a Netherlands government plane and were taken to the hospital "to
make sure that Ruben will see family faces next to his bed."
The boy would be flown back home "as soon as his medical condition allows," the
spokesman said.
Ministry spokesman Christoph Prommersberger told AFP that the boy was doing
"reasonably well."
"A colleague from the embassy (in Tripoli) was able to speak with him. He told
her he was Ruben, nine years old, from the city of Tilburg," Prommersberger
said. "He is not in a critical condition."
Dutch newspaper Babants Dagblad said the boy was likely Ruben van Assouw from
Tilburg in the southern Netherlands who had been on safari in South Africa with
his mother Trudy, 41, father Patrick, 40, and his brother Enzo, 11.
Also on board the Dutch government plane to Tripoli were forensic experts,
consular staff and transport ministry staff, the foreign ministry said.
Libya's Transport Minister Mohammed Ali Zidan said a total of 103 people -- 92
passengers of nine nationalities and an 11-strong Libyan crew -- died when an
Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A330 coming from Johannesburg disintegrated on landing
at Tripoli airport.
The Dutch foreign ministry said on Thursday that 70 Dutch nationals were among
the dead, while a diplomat said family members from the Netherlands have been
flown in to Libya courtesy of Afriqiyah to identify the bodies and prepare their
repatriation.
Johannesburg private Talk Radio 702 reported on Thursday that at least 10 South
Africans died in the crash.
Libya's transport minister said the rest of the dead included two Germans as
well as passengers from Britain, France, Finland, the Philippines and Zimbabwe,
although he could not give a breakdown of their numbers.
With the plane's black boxes recovered, investigators from manufacturers Airbus
and France where the plane was built have also flown to join the inquiry led by
Libya, which has ruled out terrorism as the cause of Wednesday's crash.
Witnesses spoke of the aircraft inexplicably breaking up as it came in to land
in clear weather.
"It is too soon to know the causes of the accident," Sabri Shadi, the chairman
of the board of Afriqiyah Airways, said about the probe into the crash.
"Several committees have been set up to investigate and we need some time before
we can draw any conclusions," he said.
"A preliminary report should be published in the next few days but definitive
results will not be know for several days, even weeks," the chairman added.
Shadi said that after a first meeting which grouped the team that US
investigators were to join the probe on Friday. The crash scene, meanwhile, has
been placed under police guard.
Libyan authorities said they were prepared to offer all assistance, granting
full access to its airport operations.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100513.0613" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Sole survivor 'probably' nine-year-old Dutch boy: media
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
The Hague, May 13, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The sole survivor of a Libyan plane crash that killed 103 people may be nine-
year-old Ruben van Assouw from Tilburg in the southern Netherlands, a local
newspaper reported Thursday.
"We received a telephone call" from officials to say that the boy, being treated
in a Libyan hospital, mentioned the name "Ruben", his grandmother An van de
Sande told the Brabants Dagblad as the foreign ministry confirmed that two
presumed family members of the injured child were on their way to Tripoli.
Ruben had been on safari in South Africa with his brother Enzo, 11, mother
Trudy, 41, and father Patrick, 40, said the newspaper.
Sixty-one Dutch citizens were believed killed when an Afriqiyah Airways plane
coming from Johannesburg disintegrated on landing around 6:00 am (0400 GMT) at
Tripoli airport on Wednesday.
Van de Sande said she and other family members had waited for news at a Brussels
air field the whole of Wednesday, "and so I haven't yet seen the television
footage" of the bruised boy in his hospital bed.
"Other family members have seen it, but it is difficult to be 100 percent sure
that it is indeed Ruben.
"We don't understand it. It's like we're in a movie."
Dutch officials said Wednesday the child had undergone surgery for broken bones
and his condition was not life-threatening.
Foreign ministry spokesman Francesco Mascini would on Thursday not confirm the
survivor's identity "until the two presumed family members have seen the child".
Mascini said the two family members had left on a government plane around 6:00
am (0400 GMT) from the port city of Rotterdam, and would make their way to the
hospital on arrival in Tripoli later in the morning.
"Until the presumed family members have seen the child, we cannot say anything
about his identity with certainty."
Also on board the plane were forensic experts and consular staff to help
identify the dead and provide support on the ground, said Mascini, as well as
experts from the transport ministry to "help determine the cause of the crash".
Dutch tourism federation ANWB said Wednesday that 61 Dutch citizens, part of two
separate tour groups on their way to Brussels and Duesseldorf, Germany died in
the crash, but this figure has not been officially confirmed.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100514.0577" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Libya plane crash boy survivor says he's 'fine'
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Tripoli, May 14, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The nine-year-old Dutch boy who was the only survivor of a plane crash that
killed 103 people said he is in a lot of pain but keen to go home, in his first
comments published on Friday.
Ruben van Assouw could remember nothing of Wednesday's disaster and was not yet
aware that his parents and 11-year-old brother had died in the accident, the
Dutch newspaper Telegraaf reported.
"My name is Ruben and I am from Holland," Telegraaf reported on a telephone
conversation with the sole survivor of the Afriqiyah Airways crash at Tripoli
airport.
"I am fine, but my legs hurt a lot," the boy told a reporter from the newspaper
on the mobile phone of one of his doctors.
"I am in a hospital," Ruben told the newspaper. "There are men and women here. I
don't know how I got here, I don't know anything more," he said.
"I really want to go home."
Libyan leader Moamer Kadhafi's eldest son, Seif al-Islam, visited the boy on
Thursday at the hospital in the capital where he is recovering after surgery on
his smashed legs, the official Jana news agency reported.
Islam had "asked about the health of the Dutch boy and about the treatment he is
receiving from doctors at Al-Khadra hospital," the Libyan news agency reported.
The boy and his family had been returning from a safari holiday in South Africa.
He has only been identified by the Dutch foreign ministry as Ruben but more
fully by Dutch media as Ruben van Assouw.
He greeted an aunt and uncle with a smile when they arrived at his Tripoli
bedside on Thursday and would be transported to the Netherlands as soon as his
medical condition allowed, a doctor said.
Officials said 70 Dutch citizens, including Ruben's family, were among the 103
people killed when the Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A330 from Johannesburg
disintegrated on landing on Wednesday.
The Dutch newspaper Brabants Dagblad said the boy was probably from Tilburg in
the southern Netherlands and that he had been on safari in South Africa with his
mother Trudy, 41, father Patrick, 40, and brother Enzo, 11.
Siddiq ben Dilla, the doctor who operated on the boy, said on Thursday that he
was "getting better" and could return to the Netherlands in the next few days.
"His family is with him now," the doctor told AFP. "His memory is good: as soon
as his relatives walked in he smiled, and was happy to see them."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100514.0805" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Haiti prosecutors seek prison for US missionary
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
PORT-AU-PRINCE, May 13, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Prosecutors asked Thursday for a six-month prison term for US missionary Laura
Silsby, who was arrested trying to leave Haiti with 33 children following the
devastating January earthquake that hit the country.
Silsby was described as the leader of a group of 10 US Baptists stopped at the
border with the Dominican Republic with the children who were purported to be
orphans.
Although she was initially accused of child abduction, the charges were later
revised to "irregular travel."
A verdict in the case is expected within a few days, judicial officials said.
Silsby and her fellow Baptist missionaries were arrested on January 29 as they
tried to take the children into the neighboring Dominican Republic by bus
without the necessary documentation.
The members of the New Life Children's Refuge missionary group denied
wrongdoing, saying they were only trying to help orphans in the wake of Haiti's
devastating January 12 earthquake that killed more than 250,000 people.
Haitian authorities later determined that all 33 children that the US
missionaries tried to remove from the country had parents, with whom they were
eventually reunited.
Silsby's defense lawyer Jean Renel Tessier argued that Silsby should not be
convicted on the charges "because the border with the Dominican Republic was
open."
The other nine missionaries arrested were all released and allowed to return to
the United States, but Silsby, the leader of the group, remained detained in
Port-au-Prince.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100515.0206" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Boy who survived Libya crash returns to Netherlands
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Eindhoven, Netherlands, May 15, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Nine-year-old Ruben van Assouw, the sole survivor of a Libyan airliner crash,
arrived back home in the Netherlands on Saturday, three days after the disaster
that killed his parents, brother and 100 others, officials said.
"The plane with the surviving boy has landed" at the Eindhoven military air
base, spokesman Markus van Tol of the Dutch tourism federation ANWB told AFP, as
reports said Ruben was then transferred to an ambulance with blacked out windows
and taken to an undisclosed hospital.
Accompanied by an uncle and aunt and the Libyan doctor who had been treating
him, the air ambulance transporting the boy landed around 2:15 pm (1215 GMT),
according to Dutch news agency ANP.
The flight had left from Matiga military airfield in the Libyan capital about
three hours earlier, with every effort being made to hide the boy from the sight
of journalists, photographers and onlookers on both ends.
"He's a very special patient. He is talking and in good health. I will stay (in
the Netherlands) for as long as necessary," Dr Siddiq ben Dilla told AFP before
the Cessna Citation air ambulance took off from Libya.
Police prevented photographers from approaching as Ruben was taken from hospital
by stretcher, covered in a blue blanket and with a black cap on his head and
scarf covering his face, to the ambulance for the journey to the airport.
Upon landing, the boy identified by the foreign ministry only as Ruben from
Tilburg in the southern Netherlands and more fully as Ruben van Assouw by Dutch
media, was taken by ambulance with two doctors and a nurse to hospital.
About an hour after landing at Eindhoven, the foreign ministry said "Ruben has
arrived safely at his final destination", which it declined to specify.
"This concludes the news about Ruben," foreign ministry spokesman Christoph
Prommersberger told AFP. "There won't be any more information, any more
updates."
The Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A330 flight from Johannesburg in South Africa
disintegrated on landing. Officials said 70 Dutch citizens were among the 103
people killed, although Afriqiyah Airways said there were 67 Dutch on board,
including Ruben.
The boy was found alive, strapped into his seat at the accident site.
A commission of inquiry said Saturday that the plane did not catch fire before
hitting the ground.
"We have not found debris detached from the plane or evidence of fire before the
accident," commission chief Neji Dhaou was quoted as saying by official news
agency JANA.
"The fire broke out 400 metres (yards) from the initial impact with the ground."
Ruben himself has told a Dutch newspaper he could remember nothing about the
crash.
"I am fine, but my legs hurt a lot," he said in a telephone interview published
Friday, adding: "I really want to go home."
Ruben's aunt and uncle said on Friday the boy was now aware that his mother,
father and 11-year-old brother died in the crash.
"We have explained to Ruben exactly what happened. He knows that his parents and
his brother are dead," they said in a statement read to media in Tripoli.
"The time ahead will be a difficult period for us," the statement said. "We hope
that the media will respect our privacy."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100515.0242" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Sole Libya plane crash survivor back in the Netherlands
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Eindhoven, Netherlands, May 15, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Nine-year-old Ruben van Assouw, the sole survivor of a Libyan airliner crash,
arrived back home in the Netherlands on Saturday, three days after the disaster
that killed his parents, brother and 100 others, officials said.
"The plane with the surviving boy has landed" at the Eindhoven military air
base, spokesman Markus van Tol of the Dutch tourism federation ANWB told AFP, as
reports said Ruben was then transferred to an ambulance with blacked out windows
and taken to an undisclosed hospital.
Accompanied by an uncle and aunt and the Libyan doctor who had been treating
him, the air ambulance transporting the boy landed around 2:15 pm (1215 GMT),
according to Dutch news agency ANP.
The flight had left from Matiga military airfield in the Libyan capital about
three hours earlier, with every effort being made to hide the boy from the sight
of journalists, photographers and onlookers on both ends.
"He's a very special patient. He is talking and in good health. I will stay (in
the Netherlands) for as long as necessary," Dr Siddiq ben Dilla told AFP before
the Cessna Citation air ambulance took off from Libya.
Police prevented photographers from approaching as Ruben was taken from hospital
by stretcher, covered in a blue blanket and with a black cap on his head and
scarf covering his face, to the ambulance for the journey to the airport.
Upon landing, the boy identified by the foreign ministry only as Ruben from
Tilburg in the southern Netherlands and more fully as Ruben van Assouw by Dutch
media, was taken by ambulance with two doctors and a nurse to hospital.
About an hour after landing at Eindhoven, the foreign ministry said "Ruben has
arrived safely at his final destination", which it declined to specify.
"This concludes the news about Ruben," foreign ministry spokesman Christoph
Promemrsberger told AFP. "There won't be any more information, any more
updates."
The boy's aunt and uncle said on Friday that Ruben was now aware that his
mother, father and 11-year-old brother died in Wednesday's crash at Tripoli
airport, whose cause remains unknown.
"We have explained to Ruben exactly what happened. He knows that his parents and
his brother are dead," they said in a statement read to media in Tripoli.
"The time ahead will be a difficult period for us," the statement said. "We hope
that the media will respect our privacy."
The Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A330 flight from Johannesburg in South Africa
disintegrated on landing.
A commission of inquiry said Saturday that the plane did not catch fire before
hitting the ground.
Ruben himself has told a Dutch newspaper he could remember nothing about the
crash.
"I am fine, but my legs hurt a lot," the boy told a reporter of the Telegraaf
newspaper in a conversation on the mobile phone of one of his doctors, adding:
"I really want to go home."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100515.0380" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
URGENT  Libya plane crash survivor leaves for home: AFP reporter
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Tripoli, May 15, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Nine-year-old Dutch boy Ruben van Assouw, the sole survivor of a plane crash
that killed 103 people, left for home on Saturday aboard a Libyan air ambulance,
an AFP reporter said.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100527.0142" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
First body from Libya plane crash repatriated: report
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Tripoli, May 27, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The body of a Dutch woman was first from the 103 people killed in a Libyan plane
crash on May 12 to be repatriated on Thursday, the official JANA news agency
reported.
"The remains of a Dutch woman were repatriated to Amsterdam" on board a KLM
flight, it said.
"The rest of the bodies will be repatriated from Saturday," it added, citing
officials. It did not report why it took two weeks before any remains of the
victims were sent home.
Most of the people who died when an Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A330 flight from
Johannesburg in South Africa disintegrated on landing at Tripoli were from the
Netherlands.
Other victims' nationalities included Austrian, Belgian, British, French,
German, Libyan, South African and Zimbabwean.
The sole survivor from the disaster, nine-year-old Ruben van Assouw, arrived
back home in the Netherlands three days after the crash that killed his parents
and brother.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100602.0045" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
US has visited man nabbed by Cuba as a 'spy'
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
washington, June 2, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US authorities have been able to visit on five occasions the American contractor
arrested in Cuba in December whom Havana claims is a spy, despite a US denial, a
State Department spokesman said Wednesday.
"We have been granted access to Alan Gross in Cuba five times, the most recent
consular access being on May 25th," spokesman Philip Crowley told reporters.
"And we continue to ask that Mr Gross be released immediately, on humanitarian
grounds, and be allowed to return to his family," the US spokesman said.
Gross worked for an NGO contracted by the State Department to supply computer
and communications material to civil society groups on the island, according to
the United States.
Cuba insists however he is a spy who had sophisticated communications equipment
for dissidents in the Americas' only one-party Communist regime.
The US company that employed the contractor, Development Alternatives Inc.
(DAI), also denied the espionage charges.
Gross was arrested December 5, reportedly while distributing cell phones,
laptops and other communications equipment.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100707.0605" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
China executes official at heart of graft trials: Xinhua
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
BEIJING, July 7, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
China on Wednesday executed a former top police and justice official at the
centre of a huge graft and organised crime scandal that riveted the nation,
state-run Xinhua news agency reported.
Wen Qiang, 54, the former head of the judiciary in the southwestern Chongqing
region and also an ex-deputy police chief, was sentenced to death in April for
charges including rape and taking bribes to protect criminal gangs.
His conviction brought to a climax a crime crackdown that lifted the lid on the
seamy underworld in the mega-city of more than 30 million people and has
resulted in more than 3,300 detentions and hundreds of prosecutions.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100709.0300" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Saga of sex, blood and football grips Brazil
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
RIO DE JANEIRO, July 9, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
It takes quite a saga to push the World Cup off the front pages in Brazil, but
such is the gruesome story of a goalkeeper accused of ordering the murder of his
ex-lover whose body parts were then fed to the dogs.
At the center of the dark drama is Bruno Souza, a star goalkeeper and captain of
defending club champion Flamengo, who surrendered to police Wednesday to face
questioning in connection with the disappearance and suspected death of Eliza
Samudio.
The story of the married 25-year-old player known simply as Bruno has stunned
this football-mad nation, where police held a press conference Thursday to lay
out the horrific crimes and Souza's bloody role in them.
"An idol like Bruno, from such a major team, is a monster for what he has done
to this girl," said Minas Gerais state police commissioner Edson Moreira, one of
the officials leading the investigation.
"The crime was coldly planned and executed. We can conclude that Eliza is dead."
Among the macabre details divulged by police: they believe Bruno was in a home
near Belo Horizonte home with Samudio last month at the time of her murder, and
that her body was later cut into pieces, some of which were fed to dogs in a bid
to cover the murder.
When Bruno was transferred from Rio de Janeiro to a police station late Thursday
in the city of Belo Horizonte, he was met with cries of "murderer!" from a crowd
of onlookers, O Globo reported on its website.
Samudio was described by the newspaper as "a student, model and pornographic
film actress."
She was also the mother of a four-month-old baby and reportedly had sought to
establish that Bruno was the child's father.
Samudio's body has not been found, but Bruno's 17-year-old cousin, who
acknowledged helping in her abduction, claimed in a lengthy deposition to police
that the woman was strangled, officials said.
The cousin also claimed to have heard Bruno tell associates to "solve the
problem" with Samudio.
According to investigators, she was strangled by a former police officer, Marcos
Aparecido dos Santos.
Another one of Bruno's cousins said in his deposition that Santos committed
"barbaric tortures" against Samudio, and that music was blared from her locked
room so that neighbors could not hear her screams, according to the Estado de
Sao Paulo newspaper.
The victim had begged Santos to stop abusing her, saying she could no longer
bear it, according to O Estado, citing the deposition.
"You are not going to bear it anymore," Santos replied. "You are going to die."
Both papers reported that Santos fed some of her remains to the Rottweiler dogs
kept at the house.
Samudio met Bruno in 2009 at the home of a Flamengo teammate, according to Istoe
magazine. In October, when she was five months pregnant, she reportedly filed a
complaint against Bruno, saying he kidnapped and beat her and tried to force her
to swallow abortion-inducing medication.
In June, Samudio met Bruno near Belo Horizonte, apparently thinking the two were
going to reach an agreement for care of the baby. It was June 7, the last time a
friend saw her alive.
Moreira said Thursday that police determined from the evidence that Bruno
remained with Samudio until her death.
"He was with her. This is the conclusion we reached," he said.
Authorities said they ordered the detention of Bruno's wife, Dayana Rodrigues,
who was found with Samudio's baby.
For his part, Bruno recently told radio Globo that he had a "clear conscience"
about Samudio's disappearance.
"In the future, I'll laugh about all of this," he said.
But in a brief Globo video clip of him discussing his future with police, he
sounded somber about his future.
"In Brazil, my hope to compete in the World Cup in 2014 is over," he said.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20100811.0280" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
China sentences to death two leaders of prostitution ring
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
BEIJING, Aug 11, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A court in China has sentenced to death two leaders of a prostitution ring which
forced hundreds of women to work in brothels in the southwestern city of
Chongqing, state media said Wednesday.
Wang Ziqi and Tao Minggu were convicted of operating nine brothels disguised as
teahouses, beauty salons and hotels in the mega-city of more than 30 million
people between 1994 and 2009, the official China News Service said.
The court convicted Wang, Tao and another 28 members of the criminal gang on
charges of organising prostitution, false imprisonment, bribery and rape.
The report did not provide details on the other sentences.
Wang, who is female, and Tao used the front companies to hide their illegal
earnings, which exceeded 100 million yuan (14.7 million dollars), the report
said.
Hundreds of women were forced to work as prostitutes, it said.
The gang bribed a number of government officials to protect their illegal
racket, including Chen Tao, a former senior police official who has been jailed
for corruption.
Chen was an associate of Wen Qiang, the former head of Chongqing's judiciary and
an ex-deputy police chief who was executed last month for charges including rape
and taking bribes to protect gangs.
Wen's death brought to a climax a crime crackdown that lifted the lid on the
seamy underworld in Chongqing and has resulted in more than 3,300 detentions and
hundreds of prosecutions.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20101007.0442" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
No talk of US-Cuba prisoner swap: US senator
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
WASHINGTON, Oct 6, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A top US senator just back from a five-day visit to Cuba to meet with officials
there said Wednesday he did not believe there was any chance of a prisoner swap
between the United States and its communist neighbor.
Senate Banking Committee chairman Christopher Dodd made the trip for talks with
officials in Havana on how to improve relations between the former Cold War
foes, his office said. The countries do not have full diplomatic ties.
Dodd, who also chairs the Senate Foreign Relations subcommittee on the Western
Hemisphere, has been a frequent vocal critic of the US trade embargo on Cuba.
In December, Cuba detained a US government contractor, Alan Gross, whom Havana
accused of distributing communications materials to civil groups.
The United States, meanwhile, since 2001 has jailed five Cuban spies for Havana.
Though US media have speculated on the possibility of a swap, Dodd said it was
not being discussed before he left for Cuba.
And he stressed that in his view, Gross' case was very different from that of
the Cubans, who were spying on US military installations. He also said that he
was not able to meet with Gross during the visit.
But in Havana, Cuban President Raul Castro urged his US counterpart, Barack
Obama, to free the five Cuban spies. Cuba maintains the spies were protecting it
from terrorism that could come from the United States, an argument that is not
likely to be an easy sell in Washington.
Castro, 79, also slammed Washington for "arbitrarily" continuing to claim that
Havana is a state sponsor of terrorism.
Obama "has failed to acknowledge the cooperation that he has received from Cuba"
in fighting terrorism, Castro said, while individuals who have committed attacks
on Cuban targets -- Luis Posada Carriles and Orlando Bosch -- are living quietly
and without being punished, in Miami.
Dodd earlier this year announced he would not seek reelection, was a lead author
of legislation to lift the effective ban on travel by US citizens to Cuba. The
measure is stalled in the US Senate. Dodd is a Democrat who represents
Connecticut.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20101108.0205" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Knox indicted in Italy sex murder case: report
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
ROME, Nov 8, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Amanda Knox, the US woman convicted of the sex-murder of a British student in
Italy, was indicted Monday on slander charges for claiming police beat her
during interrogation, ANSA news agency reported.
The 23-year-old's trial on the charges of slandering seven police officers and
an interpreter is due to start on May 17 next year, the report said.
Knox's trial on appeal for the murder is set to start on November 24.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20101111.0137" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Christian woman sentenced to death in Pakistan
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
LAHORE, Pakistan, Nov 11, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Pakistani court has sentenced to death a Christian mother of five for
blasphemy, the first such conviction of a woman and sparking protests from
rights groups Thursday.
Asia Bibi, 45, was sentenced Monday by a local court in Nankana district in
Pakistan's central province Punjab, about 75 kilometres (47 miles) west of the
country's cultural capital of Lahore.
Pakistan has yet to execute anyone for blasphemy, but the case spotlights the
Muslim country's controversial laws on the subject which rights activists say
encourages Islamist extremism in a nation wracked by Taliban attacks.
Asia's case dates back to June 2009 when she was asked to fetch water while out
working in the fields. But a group of Muslim women labourers objected, saying
that as a non-Muslim, she should not touch the water bowl.
A few days later the women went to a local cleric and alleged that Asia made
made derogatory remarks about the Prophet Mohammed. The cleric went to local
police, who opened an investigation.
She was arrested in Ittanwalai village and prosecuted under Section 295 C of the
Pakistan Penal Code, which carries the death penalty.
Sentencing her to hang, Judge Naveed Iqbal "totally ruled out" any chance that
Asia was falsely implicated and said there were "no mitigating circumstances",
according to a copy of the verdict seen by AFP.
Husband Ashiq Masih, 51, told AFP that he would appeal her death sentence, which
needs to be upheld by the Lahore high court, the highest tribunal in Punjab,
before it can be carried out.
"The case is baseless and we will file an appeal," he said.
The couple have two sons and three daughters.
Rights activists and minority pressure groups said it was the first time that a
woman had been sentenced to hang in Pakistan for blasphemy, although a Muslim
couple were jailed for life last year.
Human rights activists want the controversial legislation repealed, saying it is
exploited for personal enmity and encourages Islamist extremism.
"The blasphemy law is absolutely obscene and it needs to be repealed in
totality," Human Rights Watch spokesman Ali Dayan Hasan told AFP.
"It is primarily used against vulnerable groups that face social and political
discrimination. Heading that category are religious minorities and heterodox
Muslim sects," he said.
Asked about Asia's case at a press conference in Islamabad on Thursday, visiting
Italian Foreign Minister Franco Frattini said he was unaware of the details but
would raise the matter with Pakistan's minorities minister.
"The Italian position has always been against the death penalty," he told
reporters. He said he raised the problems faced by Christian minorities during
his talks with his Pakistani counterpart Shah Mehmood Qureshi.
"I believe they should not misuse the law of blasphemy to discriminate against
religious minorities and this is a point I share with my colleague -- this is a
key point for me."
Around three percent of Pakistan's population of 167 million is estimated to be
non-Muslim.
Last July, two Christian brothers accused of writing a blasphemous pamphlet
critical of the Prophet Mohammed were shot dead outside a court in Punjab.
Pastor Rashid Emmanuel, 32, and his brother Sajjad, were killed as they left a
court hearing in Faisalabad city, where hundreds of Muslim protesters had
demanded they be sentenced to death.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20101120.0308" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Pakistan official backs Christian's blasphemy death appeal
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
LAHORE, Pakistan, Nov 20, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A top Pakistan government official Saturday backed a Christian mother's appeal
against a death sentence for blasphemy, saying he hoped President Asif Ali
Zardari would pardon her.
Asia Bibi was sentenced to hang in Pakistan's central province of Punjab earlier
this month after being accused of insulting the Prophet Mohammed in 2009.
Punjab governor Salman Taseer met Bibi in prison and told a televised press
conference afterwards that he would personally pass on her request for clemency.
"I will soon meet President Asif Ali Zardari and hand him over Bibi's appeal,"
he said. "I hope that the president will pardon her."
The contents of the appeal were not immediately known, but Taseer said he was
supporting it on humanitarian grounds.
Pakistan has yet to execute anyone for blasphemy, but the case spotlights a
controversial law which rights activists say encourages Islamist extremism in a
Muslim country on the front line of the US-led war on Al-Qaeda.
Pope Benedict XVI this week called for Bibi's release and said Christians in
Pakistan were "often victims of violence and discrimination."
Minister for minority affairs Shahbaz Bhatti earlier this week asked the Punjab
government for a thorough re-investigation and a fair appeal hearing for the
mother of five.
At the Lahore high court, the top court in Punjab, Bibi has filed a separate
appeal against her conviction.
Her lawyer S.K. Chaudhry said the court would take up the case next week.
In June 2009, Bibi was asked to fetch water while out working in the fields. But
Muslim women labourers objected, saying that as a non-Muslim, she should not
touch the water bowl.
Bibi was later arrested by police and prosecuted under the Pakistan Penal Code
on a complaint by Muslim women that she made derogatory remarks about the
Prophet Mohammed.
Rights activists and minority pressure groups said it was the first time that a
woman had been sentenced to hang in Pakistan for blasphemy, although a Muslim
couple were jailed for life last year.
Only around three percent of Pakistan's population of 167 million are estimated
to be non-Muslim.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20101125.0111" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Pakistan minister seeks pardon for blasphemy death Christian
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
ISLAMABAD, Nov 25, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Pakistani cabinet minister Thursday presented a report to President Asif Ali
Zardari recommending a pardon for a Christian mother of five sentenced to death
for blasphemy against Islam.
Asia Bibi was sentenced to hang in Pakistan's central province of Punjab earlier
this month after being found guilty of insulting the Prophet Mohammed.
Rights activists say Pakistan's controversial blasphemy law, under which the
offence is punishable by death, encourages Islamist extremism in a Muslim
country on the front line of the US-led war on Al-Qaeda.
"The report recommended pardon for Asia Bibi and suspension of the sentence," a
government statement said after minority affairs minister Shahbaz Bhatti
presented the document to President Zardari at a meeting in Islamabad.
It said the report "concluded that the blasphemy case against Asia Bibi has been
registered on grounds of personal enmity".
The document recommended providing security both to Bibi in prison and to her
family, who say they have gone into hiding because of death threats.
In the meeting Bhatti, who himself is a Christian and was commissioned by
Zardari to investigate the case, said the minority community "has great respect
for all the Holy Prophets and the Holy Books," the statement said.
"The people belonging to minorities as a marginalised community know fully well
the consequences of blasphemy and could never think of committing the offence,"
it quoted him as saying.
The president asked Bhatti to draw up a committee to propose reforms to the
blasphemy law to "effectively prevent the misuse of (it) for personal and
political reasons," the statement added.
Pope Benedict XVI last week called for Bibi's release and said Christians in
Pakistan were "often victims of violence and discrimination."
Punjab governor Salman Taseer on Sunday was the first senior government official
to appeal to Zardari for clemency after visiting Bibi in prison.
The case began in June 2009 when Bibi was asked to fetch water while out working
in the fields. Muslim women labourers objected, saying that as a non-Muslim, she
should not touch the water bowl.
Bibi was later arrested by police and prosecuted after Muslim women complained
that she made derogatory remarks about the Prophet Mohammed.
Rights activists and pressure groups say it is the first time that a woman had
been sentenced to hang in Pakistan for blasphemy.
Only around three percent of Pakistan's population of 167 million are estimated
to be non-Muslim.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20101216.0136" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
Italian court upholds Ivorian's sentence in sex murder
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
Rome, Dec 16, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Italy's highest appeals court on Thursday confirmed a sentence of 16 years for
an Ivorian man convicted of sexually assaulting and murdering a British student
in 2007.
Rudy Guede was was tried separately from American Amanda Knox and Italian
Raffaele Sollecito, who have also been convicted of the murder and are both
currently appealing in a trial in the town of Perugia.
"Meredith Kercher's family is satisfied by this decision," Francesco Maresca, a
lawyer for the family, said after the ruling.
He said there should now be "an identical solution" for Knox and Sollecito.
The 21-year-old victim, Meredith Kercher, was in Perugia as an exchange student
from Leeds University and shared a cottage with Seattle native Knox.
Kercher was found semi-naked in a pool of blood on November 2, 2007.
Prosecutors said she was assaulted and killed by Guede, Sollecito and Knox as
part of a drug-fuelled sex orgy. Knox is currently serving a 26-year sentence
for the crime and Sollecito was handed a 25-year sentence.
Sollecito and Knox say they are innocent. Guede has claimed he was in the house
at the time of the murder but had no part in it.
Guede was convicted during a fast-track trial in 2008 but then had his sentence
reduced from 30 years to 16 years in December 2009 on appeal.
The appeal court said then it had reduced the sentence because of Guede's young
age of just 20 at the time of the killing, his "difficult life" and the fact
that he was the only one who had apologised to Kercher's family.
</TEXT>
</DOC>
<DOC id="AFP_ENG_20101229.0078" type="story" >
<HEADLINE>
I. Coast UN envoy warns of 'genocide' threat
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
UNITED NATIONS, Dec 29, 2010 (AFP)
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The first recognized ambassador of Ivory Coast's internationally-backed
president Alassane Ouattara said Tuesday that the United Nations had to act to
prevent "genocide" in his country.
The envoy, Youssoufou Bamba, made the plea after handing over his credentials as
envoy to the United Nations to UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon.
Ban promised the "full cooperation" of the UN leadership for the government of
Ouattara who is in a tense standoff with Laurent Gbagbo, who refuses to
recognize the victory of his rival in Ivory Coast's November 28 presidential
election.
The ambassador said Ouattara had "real concern" about attacks on his supporters.
According to UN rights officials at least 173 people were killed in attacks
between December 16 and 21.
The victims were only killed "because they wanted to demonstrate, they want to
speak out, they want to defend the will of the people," Bamba told reporters.
"We are on the brink of genocide, something should be done."
Bamba said people's homes in some areas had been marked according to their
tribe. "What will be next? So the situation is very serious and I have put that
message across in all the meetings I have had, including with the secretary
general."
"The protection of civilians is at the heart of peacekeeping and we expect the
United Nations to fulfill its duties," he said.
There is a UN force of more than 9,500 troops in Ivory Coast and 800 are
deployed around the Abidjan hotel where Ouattara has his base.
Ban made no comment on the Ivory Coast crisis when he formally accepted Bamba's
credentials in front of photographers at the UN headquarters.
But he assured the envoy "of the full cooperation of the secretariat in meeting
the challenges ahead."
Ban was briefed again Tuesday by the UN mission in Ivory Coast on efforts to
persuade Gbagbo to peacefully stand down, his spokesman Martin Nesirky said.
The UN chief also held telephone talks with Nigeria's President Goodluck
Jonathan, current chairman of the West African regional bloc ECOWAS, which has
threatened to intervene militarily if Gbagbo does not quit.
Bamba, who was previously ambassador for the Gbagbo government at the UN in
Vienna, is the first ambassador named by the Ouattara administration to have
started work. He hinted that he was not yet being paid, saying that as a career
diplomat "I have savings."
</TEXT>
</DOC>
